District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0188.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Pretrial Detention Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. The Secure DC Omnibus Amendment Act of 2024, effective June 8, 2024 (D.C.
Law 25-175; 71 DCR 2732), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 18(c)(2) is repealed.
(b) Section 30(k) is repealed.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect after approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as

provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
Columbia Register.